Tennessee, session 114, SB2353.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 66-24-101(a), is amended by
deleting subdivision (1) and substituting:
(1) All agreements, and notices, affidavits, memoranda, or abstracts related to
the agreements, and bonds for the conveyance of real or personal estate; provided, that
all agreements, and notices, affidavits, memoranda, and abstracts related to the
agreements must contain:
(A) The signatures of all parties subject to the agreement, authenticated
pursuant to § 66-22-101; and
(B) The expiration date of the agreement, which includes the day, month,
and year;
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2353
012145
- 1 -